District of Columbia statutes.
46-353.08

Duty of Office of the Attorney General.

The Office of the Attorney General may determine that a foreign country has established a reciprocal arrangement for child support with the District and take appropriate action for notification of the determination.

Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 308, 63 DCR 222